Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-121.03
Appropriation required.

The Legislature shall appropriate from the General Fund the money necessary to carry out the duties and programs of the Nebraska College of Technical Agriculture at Curtis. The appropriation shall be made to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for the sole purpose of maintaining the duties, programs, and facilities of such college.

Laws 1988, LB 1042, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 63;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 7, § 2.